Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1624.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Location Information Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Collect." To obtain, infer, generate, create, receive or access an individual's location information."Consent." Permission that is voluntary, specific, informed and unambiguous. The term does not include any agreement:123456789101112131415161718 (1) secured without first providing to the individual a clear and conspicuous disclosure of all information material to the provision of the agreement, apart from any privacy policy, terms of service, terms of use, general release, user agreement or other similar document; or(2) obtained through the use of a user interface designed or manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision making or choice."Covered entity." An individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association or other group, however organized. The term includes an agent of an entity. The term does not include a State or local government agency, or a court of the Commonwealth, a clerk of the court or a judge or justice thereof, or an individual acting in a noncommercial context."Device." A mobile telephone or other electronic device located in this Commonwealth that is or may commonly be carried by or on an individual and is capable of connecting to a cellular, bluetooth or other wireless network."Disclose." To make location information available to a third party, including sharing, publishing, releasing, transferring, disseminating, providing access to or otherwise communicating the location information orally, in writing, electronically or by any other means."Individual." An individual located in this Commonwealth."Location information." As follows:(1) Information derived from a device, or from an interaction between devices, with or without the knowledge of the user and regardless of the technological method used, that pertains to or directly or indirectly reveals the 20250HB1624PN1965 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 present or past geographical location of an individual or device with sufficient precision to identify street-level location information within a range of 1,850 feet or less.(2) The term includes any of the following:(i) An internet protocol address capable of revealing the physical or geographical location of an individual.(ii) Global Positioning System coordinates.(iii) Cell-site location information.(3) The term does not include information identifiable or derived solely from the visual content of a legally obtained image, including the location of the device that captured the image, or publicly posted words."Location privacy policy." A description of the policies, practices and procedures controlling a covered entity's collection, processing, management, storage, retention and deletion of location information."Monetize." The selling, renting, trading or leasing of location information."Permissible purpose." Any of the following purposes:(1) Provision of a product, service or service feature to the individual to whom the location information pertains when the individual requested the provision of the product, service or service feature by subscribing to, creating an account or otherwise contracting with a covered entity.(2) Initiation, management, execution or completion of a financial or commercial transaction to fulfill an order for specific products or services requested by an individual, including any associated routine administrative, operational and account-servicing activity, including billing, shipping, 20250HB1624PN1965 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 delivery, storage and accounting.(3) Compliance with an obligation under Federal or State law.(4) Response to an emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 communication or other communication reporting an imminent threat to human life."Process." To perform an action or set of actions on or with location information, including collecting, accessing, using, storing, retaining, analyzing, creating, generating, aggregating, altering, correlating, operating on, recording, modifying, organizing, structuring, disposing of, destroying, de-identifying or otherwise manipulating location information. This term does not include disclosing location information."Reasonably understandable." Of a length and complexity such that an individual with at least an eighth grade reading level as established in the Pennsylvania Core Standards for English Language Arts, Grade 8, adopted by the Department of Education of the Commonwealth, can read and comprehend."Service feature." A discrete aspect of a service provided by a covered entity, including real-time directions, real-time weather and identity authentication."Service provider." An individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association or other group, however organized, that collects, processes or transfers location information for the sole purpose of conducting, and only to the extent that the individual or entity conducts, business activities on behalf of, for the benefit of, at the direction of and under contractual agreement with a covered entity."Third party." As follows:(1) A covered entity or person other than:20250HB1624PN1965 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) a covered entity that collected or processed location information in accordance with this act or its service providers; or(ii) the individual to whom location information pertains.(2) The term does not include a government entity.Section 3. Protection of location information.(a) Prohibited conduct.--It shall be unlawful for a covered entity to collect or process an individual's location information unless:(1) for a permissible purpose; and(2) prior to collecting or processing the individual's location information for a permissible purpose, the covered entity:(i) provides the individual with a copy of the reasonably understandable location privacy policy; and(ii) obtains consent from the individual.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) does not apply if the collection or processing occurs:(1) in compliance with an obligation under Federal or State law; or(2) in response to an emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 communication or other communication reporting an imminent threat to human life.(c) Disclosure required.--(1) If a covered entity collects location information on an individual for more than one permissible purpose, the covered entity shall disclose the purposes in the location privacy policy in a reasonably understandable format and must obtain the individual's discrete consent for each purpose.20250HB1624PN1965 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) This subsection shall not apply if the purpose of collecting and processing the location information is to:(i) comply with an obligation under Federal or State law; or(ii) respond to an emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 communication or other communication reporting an imminent threat to human life.(d) (Reserved).(e) Expiration of consent and effect.--(1) Consent provided under this section shall expire upon the earliest of the following events:(i) One year after the date the consent was provided.(ii) The date when the initial purpose for processing the information has been satisfied.(iii) The date when the individual revokes consent, provided that consent may be renewed according to the same procedure as when the consent was first provided.(2) Upon expiration of consent, the covered entity shall destroy any of the individual's location information possessed by the covered entity.(f) Other prohibited conduct.--It shall be unlawful for a covered entity or service provider that lawfully collects and processes location information for a permissible purpose to engage in any of the following conduct:(1) Collect more precise location information than necessary to carry out the permissible purpose.(2) Retain location information longer than necessary to carry out the permissible purpose.(3) Sell, rent, trade or lease the location information.20250HB1624PN1965 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Derive or infer from location information any data that is not necessary to carry out the permissible purpose.(5) Disclose, cause to disclose or assist with or facilitate the disclosure of an individual's location information to third parties, unless the disclosure is:(i) necessary to carry out the permissible purpose; or(ii) consented to by the individual to whom the location data pertains.(g) Disclosure to government agencies and officials.--It shall be unlawful for a covered entity or service provider to disclose location information to a Federal, State or local government agency or official unless:(1) the agency or official serves the covered entity or service provider with a valid warrant;(2) an individual is at risk of danger of death or serious physical injury, as long as:(i) The request is approved by a high-ranking agency officer for emergency access to location information.(ii) The request is based on the agency's good faith determination that it has a lawful basis to access the information on a nonemergency basis.(iii) The agency agrees to petition a court for an appropriate order within three days and to destroy the information if that order is not granted.This paragraph does not apply to an individual accessing, procuring or searching for services regarding contraception, pregnancy care and perinatal care, including, but not limited to, abortion services;(3) the disclosure is mandated under Federal or State 20250HB1624PN1965 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 law; or(4) the individual to whom the location information pertains consented to the disclosure.(h) Location privacy policy.--A covered entity shall maintain and provide to an individual to whom location information applies a location privacy policy. The location privacy policy shall be posted on the covered entity's publicly accessible Internet website. The location privacy policy shall include the following:(1) The permissible purpose for which the covered entity is collecting, processing or disclosing any location information.(2) The type of location information collected, including the time and geographic precision of the location information collected.(3) The identities of service providers with which the covered entity contracts with respect to location information.(4) Any disclosures of location information necessary to carry out a permissible purpose and the identities of the third parties to whom the location information could be disclosed.(5) The data management and data security policies governing location information.(6) The retention schedule and guidelines for permanently deleting location information.(i) Notice of changes.--A covered entity in lawful possession of location information shall provide notice to individuals to whom the information pertains of any change to the covered entity's location privacy policy at least 20 20250HB1624PN1965 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business days before the change goes into effect in a reasonably understandable format, and shall request and obtain consent from the individual before collecting or processing the individual's location information in accordance with the change to the location privacy policy.(j) Monetization by government entities prohibited.--It shall be unlawful for a government entity to monetize location information.Section 4. Prohibition against retaliation.A covered entity may not take adverse action against an individual because the individual exercised or refused to waive any of the individual's rights under this act, unless location information is essential to the provision of the good, service, or service feature that the individual requests, and then only to the extent that the data is essential. The prohibition in this section includes:(1) Refusing to provide a good or service to the individual.(2) Charging different prices or rates for goods or services, including through the use of discounts or other benefits or imposing penalties.(3) Providing a different level or quality of goods or services to the individual.Section 5. Enforcement.A violation of this act or a regulation promulgated under this act regarding an individual's location information constitutes an injury to the individual and shall be deemed an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.20250HB1624PN1965 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6. Civil penalties.(a) Action by Attorney General.--The Attorney General may bring an action under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, against a covered entity or service provider to remedy violations of this act and for other appropriate relief.(b) Private right of action.--(1) An individual who alleges a violation of this act committed by a covered entity or service provider may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction, provided that the action must be brought in the county in which the individual resides or was located at the time of the violation.(2) An individual who brings an action under paragraph (1) shall not be required, as a condition of service or otherwise, to file an administrative complaint with the Attorney General or to accept mandatory arbitration of a claim arising under this act.(c) Relief.--In a civil action brought under this section in which the plaintiff prevails, the court may award:(1) Actual damages, including damages for emotional distress, or $100, whichever is greater for a violation.(2) Punitive damages.(3) Any other relief, including an injunction or declaratory judgment, that the court deems appropriate. The court shall consider each instance in which the covered entity or service provider collects, processes or discloses location information in a manner prohibited by this act or a regulation promulgated under this act as constituting a separate violation of this act or regulation promulgated 20250HB1624PN1965 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this act.(d) Attorney fees and costs.--The court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under subsection (b).(e) Construction.--No enforcement action, whether brought by a government entity or a private individual under this act shall preclude or limit the ability of any other person from bringing an action under this act.Section 7. Waiver of rights prohibited.A provision of a contract or agreement, including a covered entity's terms of service or policies, including the covered entity's location privacy policy, that purports to waive or limit an individual's rights under this act to a right to a remedy or means of enforcement shall be deemed contrary to State law and shall be void and unenforceable.Section 8. Implementation.The Attorney General may promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation, administration and enforcement of this act.Section 9. Applicability.Location information collected, processed or stored prior to the effective date of this section shall be subject to section 3(f)(3) and (5) and (g).Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1624PN1965 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324